Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,127.01
Donations authorized.

The Public Elementary and Secondary Student Fee Authorization Act does not limit the ability of a governing body to request donations of money, materials, equipment, or attire to defray costs if the request is made in such a way that it is clear that the request is not a requirement. The act does not prohibit a governing body from permitting students to supply materials for course projects.

Laws 2003, LB 249, § 5.